Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF52.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1642SS (1) 91 th/ns S.F. 52 Section 1. Section 321.109, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. a. Notwithstanding subsection 1 or any 3 other provision of law to the contrary, if a volunteer fire 4 fighter, as defined in section 85.61, meets the criteria set 5 forth in paragraph âbâ , the annual registration fee of one 6 vehicle displaying special registration plates issued pursuant 7 to section 321.34, subsection 10, and owned by the volunteer 8 fire fighter shall not exceed one hundred dollars. The annual 9 registration fee for no more than one vehicle per household is 10 eligible for this limitation. 11 b. A volunteer fire fighter qualifies for the benefit 12 provided in paragraph âaâ if the volunteer fire fighter meets 13 all of the following criteria: 14 (1) The person has served at least five years as a volunteer 15 fire fighter. 16 (2) The personâs compensation is less than five thousand 17 dollars per year for service as a volunteer fire fighter. 18 (3) The person actively attends and participates in monthly 19 meetings, trainings, responses, and other duties as determined 20 by the public entity that the person serves. 21 (4) The person meets any additional requirements 22 established by the public entity that the person serves. 23